Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.110

Ferries—Authority to acquire and maintain.

Any incorporated city or town within the state is authorized to construct, or condemn and purchase, or purchase, and to maintain a ferry across any unfordable stream adjoining and within one mile of its limits, together with all necessary grounds, roads, approaches and landings necessary or appertaining thereto located within one mile of the limits of such city or town, with full jurisdiction and authority to manage, regulate and control the same beyond the limits of the corporation and to operate the same free or for toll.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.21.110. Prior: 1895 c 130 s 1; RRS s 5476.]